Hawaii statutes.
§130-2 Effect of official state acts.
During such time as the seat of government remains at an emergency temporary
location, or locations, all official acts required by law to be performed at
the seat of government by any officer, agency, department, or authority of the
State, including the convening and meeting of the legislature in any kind of
session, shall be as valid and binding when performed at the emergency
temporary location, or locations, as if performed at the normal location of the
seat of government. [L 1959, c 16, §2; Supp, §359A-2; HRS §130-2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next